Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-941.01
Potentially disqualifying conviction, defined.

Potentially disqualifying conviction includes a conviction for:

(1) Criminal attempt as provided in section 28-201, conspiracy as provided in section 28-202, or aiding and abetting as provided in section 28-206, to commit an offense listed in this section;

(2) Murder as provided in sections 28-303 or 28-304;

(3) Manslaughter as provided in section 28-305;

(4) Motor vehicle homicide as provided in section 28-306;

(5) Assault in the first or second degree as provided in sections 28-308 and 28-309;

(6) Terroristic threats as provided in section 28-311.01;

(7) Stalking as provided in section 28-311.03;

(8) A violation relating to mobile tracking devices under section 28-1337;

(9) Kidnapping as provided in section 28-313;

(10) False imprisonment as provided in sections 28-314 and 28-315;

(11) A sexual act subject to criminal penalties as provided in sections 28-317 to 28-322.07;

(12) Domestic assault as provided in section 28-323;

(13) Robbery as provided in section 28-324;

(14) Arson as provided in sections 28-502, 28-503, and 28-504;

(15) Fraud subject to criminal penalties as provided in sections 28-505, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-640, and 28-935;

(16) Theft as provided in sections 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, and 28-515;

(17) Forgery as provided in sections 28-602 and 28-603;

(18) Incest as provided in section 28-703;

(19) Child abuse as provided in section 28-707;

(20) Human trafficking, labor trafficking, sex trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor as provided in section 28-831;

(21) False reporting as provided in section 28-907;

(22) Swatting under section 28-907.01;

(23) Perjury as provided in section 28-915;

(24) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the first degree as provided in section 28-929;

(25) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the second degree as provided in section 28-930;

(26) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the third degree as provided in section 28-931;

(27) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle as provided in section 28-931.01;

(28) An offense that has as an element the threat to inflict serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 or death on another person, the intentional infliction of serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 on another person, or intentionally causing the death of another person;

(29) An offense for which registration is required under the Sex Offender Registration Act; or

(30) Any offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in this section.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 43;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 48.
July 18, 2026The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB935, section 43, with LB965, section 48, to reflect all amendments.
Sex Offender Registration Act, see section 29-4001.